test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kiorac_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩiõrâč contract stem lukija: # Noun - full paradigm
     ǩiõrâč+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ǩiõrâč
     ǩiõrâč+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: ǩiõrâč
     ǩiõrâč+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: ǩiõrâč
     ǩiõrâč+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: ǩiõrča
     ǩiõrâč+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: ǩiõrčest
     ǩiõrâč+N+Sg+Com+Indef: ǩiõrčin
     ǩiõrâč+N+Ess+Indef: ǩiõrčen
     ǩiõrâč+N+Par+Indef: ǩiõrčed
     ǩiõrâč+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [ǩiõrâčtaa, ǩiõrâčtää]
     ǩiõrâč+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ǩiõrâč
     ǩiõrâč+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: ǩiõrči
     ǩiõrâč+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: ǩiõrčid
     ǩiõrâč+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: ǩiõrčid
     ǩiõrâč+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: ǩiõrčin
     ǩiõrâč+N+Pl+Com+Indef: ǩiõrčivuiʹm
     ǩiõrâč+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [ǩiõrčitaa, ǩiõrčitää]
     
